Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 7
HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES
FOR PERSONS WITH BRAIN INJURY

25.5-6-701. Short title.

This part 7 shall be known and may be cited as the "Home- and Community-based Services for Persons with Brain Injury Act".

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1953, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-681 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-702. Legislative declaration - no entitlement created.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the purpose of this part 7 is to provide, under federal authorization and subject to available appropriations, home- and community-based services for persons with brain injury.

Nothing in this part 7 shall be construed to establish that eligible persons as defined in section 25.5-6-703 (4) are entitled to receive services from the state department. The provision of any services pursuant to this part 7 shall be subject to federal waiver authorization and available appropriations.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1953, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-682 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-703. Definitions.

As used in this part 7, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adult day care" means health and social services furnished two or more hours per day on a regularly scheduled basis for one or more days per week in an outpatient setting and for the purpose of ensuring the optimal functioning of the recipient.

"Behavioral programming" means an individualized plan that sets forth strategies to decrease a recipient's maladaptive behaviors that interfere with the recipient's ability to remain in the community. Behavioral programming includes a complete assessment of maladaptive behaviors of the recipient, the development and implementation of a structured behavioral intervention plan, continuous training and supervision of caregivers and behavioral aides, and periodic reassessment of the individualized plan.

"Brain injury" means an injury to the brain arising from external forces including, but not limited to, toxic chemical reactions, anoxia, near drownings, closed or open head injuries, and focal brain injuries.

"Eligible person" means a person:

Who has a diagnosis of brain injury, as such term is defined in subsection (3) of this section;

Who is in need of the level of care available in a hospital, rehabilitation hospital, hospital in lieu of a nursing facility, or is in need of specialized care provided in a nursing facility in lieu of a hospital;

Who is categorically eligible for medical assistance, or has a gross income that does not exceed three hundred percent of the current federal supplemental security income benefit level and resources that do not exceed the limit established for individuals receiving a mandatory minimum state supplementation of supplemental security income benefits or, in the case of a person who is married, do not exceed the amount authorized in section 25.5-6-101; and

For whom the cost of services would not exceed the average cost of hospital care.

"Independent living skills training" means skills and therapies that are directed at the development and maintenance of community living skills and community integration. Independent living skills include supervision or training with respect to or assistance with self-care, communication skills, socialization, sensory and motor development, reducing maladaptive behavior, community living and mobility, and therapeutic recreation.

"Personal care services" means assistance with eating, bathing, dressing, personal hygiene, and activities of daily living. Personal care services include assistance with the preparation of meals, but not the cost of the meals, and homemaker services that are necessary for the health and safety of the recipient.

"Structured day treatment" means structured, nonresidential therapeutic treatment services that are directed at the development and maintenance of community living skills and are provided two or more hours per day on a regularly scheduled basis for one or more days per week. Day treatment services include supervision and specific training that allows a recipient to function at the recipient's maximum potential. The services include, but are not limited to, social skills training that allows for reintegration into the community, sensory and motor development services, and services aimed at reducing maladaptive behavior.

"Supported living" means assistance or support designed to maximize or maintain independence and self-direction on a supportive care campus. Supported living services consist of structured interventions designed to provide:

Protective oversight and supervision;

Behavioral management and cognitive supports;

Interpersonal and social skills development;

Improved household management skills to support independence and community integration; and

Medical management.

"Supportive care campus" means a residential campus that provides supported living services.

"Transitional living" means a nonmedical residential program that provides training and twenty-four-hour supervision to a recipient that will enhance the recipient's ability to live more independently.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1954, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(10) amended, (SB 14-160), ch. 153, p. 531, § 1, effective May 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-683 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this part 7, see § 25.5-4-103.

25.5-6-704. Implementation of home- and community-based services program for persons with brain injury authorized - federal waiver - duties of the department - rules.

The state department is hereby authorized to seek any necessary waiver from the federal government to develop and implement a home- and community-based services program for persons with brain injury. The state department shall design the program to provide home- and community-based services to eligible persons. Eligibility shall be limited to persons who meet the level of services provided in a hospital, rehabilitation hospital, hospital in lieu of nursing facility care, or who are in need of specialized care provided in a nursing facility in lieu of a hospital.

The state department shall seek any necessary amendments to the current federal waiver for the home- and community-based services program for persons with brain injury to allow supported living, as defined in section 25.5-6-703 (8), to be provided to eligible persons on a supportive care campus.

Services for eligible persons may be established in department rules to the extent authorized or required by federal waiver, but must include at least the following:

Independent living skills training, as indicated in the eligible person's plan of care, and provided by local agencies determined by the department to be qualified to provide the services;

Residential care including, but not limited to:

Transitional living;

Respite care;

Supported living;

Personal care services;

Assisted transportation;

Counseling and training including treatment for substance use disorders and family counseling;

Environmental modification services;

Day care, which may include physical, occupational, and speech therapies as indicated in the eligible person's plan of care;

Structured day treatment, which may include physical, occupational, speech, and cognitive therapies if deemed necessary by the eligible person's case manager and as indicated in the person's plan of care. Structured day treatment services are for individuals who may benefit from continued rehabilitation and reintegration into the community.

Behavioral programming that may be provided in or outside an eligible person's residence;

Assistive technology;

Services provided under the consumer-directed care service model, part 11 of this article.

The case manager, in coordination with the eligible person and the person's family or guardian, shall include in each plan of care a process by which the eligible person may receive necessary care, which may include respite care, if the eligible person's family or service provider is unavailable due to an emergency situation or to unforeseen circumstances. The eligible person and the person's family or guardian shall be duly informed by the case manager of these alternative care provisions at the time the plan of care is initiated.

The department shall provide a system of reimbursement for services provided pursuant to this part 7 that encourages the most cost-effective provision of services.

A member of an eligible person's family, other than the person's spouse or a parent of a minor, may be employed to provide personal care services to such person. The maximum reimbursement for the services provided by a member of the person's family per year for an eligible person shall not exceed the equivalent of four hundred forty-four service units per year for a member of the eligible person's family. Standards that apply to other providers who provide personal care services apply to a family member who provides these services. In addition, a registered nurse shall supervise a family member in providing services to the extent indicated in the eligible person's plan of care.

The state department shall, subject to appropriation, use available federal, state, local, or private funds including, but not limited to, medicaid funds available under Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, to carry out the purposes of this part 7.

The state board shall adopt rules concerning the certification of agencies as medicaid providers for the purposes of this part 7, fiscal and administrative procedures, procedures for reviewing plans of care, reimbursement rates, and the scope, duration, and content of programs and the eligibility for specific services provided pursuant to this part 7. The state board shall adopt such rules as are necessary to fulfill the obligations of the state department as the single state agency to administer medical assistance programs in accordance with Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended.

No later than January 2024, the state department shall submit a report to the senate health and human services committee, the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee, and the house of representatives health and insurance committee, or any successor committees, as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" presentation required by section 2-7-203. At a minimum, the report must identify:

A reimbursement system with a goal to incentivize and increase transportation provider participation;

How the state department will ensure compliance with applicable federal laws and waiver requirements;

A system of common reporting to ensure a recipient does not exceed the medicaid benefit in a multi-provider scenario; and

Best practices based on what other states have done to allow transportation network companies to provide nonmedical transportation services for individuals receiving services, including but not limited to, reimbursement rates; driver compensation; and integration with programs that provide nonmedical transportation services.

In developing the report, the state department shall engage in a stakeholder process that includes individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families, individuals with disabilities, and transportation network companies. The report may be developed in conjunction with the reporting requirement in sections 25.5-6-307 (6), 25.5-6-409 (6), 25.5-6-606 (9), and 25.5-6-1303 (9).

Upon completion of the report described in subsection (7)(a) of this section, the state department shall analyze and review each operational transportation network company, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (3). The state department shall verify each transportation network company's viability to ensure the health, safety, welfare, cost effectiveness, and capability in expanding nonmedical transportation services for individuals receiving services pursuant to this section and comply with all rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (7)(e)(I) of this section.

No later than July 1, 2024, the state department shall authorize verified transportation network companies to provide nonmedical transportation services if the state department finds the transportation network company viable under federal requirements and within budgetary constraints.

For the purposes of this subsection (7)(c), "verify" means a transportation network company meets all requirements resulting from the report described in subsection (7)(a) of this section.

The state department may seek any necessary federal authorization for the implementation of this subsection (7).

The state department shall promulgate any necessary rules to ensure transportation network companies comply with federal and state oversight requirements and shall include all relevant stakeholders, including medicaid recipients, transportation network companies, current providers and drivers for nonmedical transportation services, and other interested parties in the development of such requirements.

Pursuant to section 40-10.1-105 (1)(l), transportation network companies are not subject to regulation by the public utilities commission when providing nonmedical transportation services pursuant to this section and are instead subject to rules promulgated by the state department pursuant to this subsection (7)(e).

This subsection (7) does not apply to a provider authorized to provide transportation services pursuant to part 8 of article 1 of title 25.5 prior to August 10, 2022.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1955, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

IP(2) and (2)(e) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1330, § 210, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

(7) added, (HB 22-1114), ch. 396, p. 2820, § 5, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-684 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1114, see section 1 of chapter 396, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

25.5-6-705. Implementation of part contingent upon receipt of federal waiver - repeal of part.

The implementation of this part 7 is conditioned upon the issuance of necessary waivers by the federal government and available appropriations. The provisions of this part 7 shall be implemented to the extent authorized by federal waiver. The state department shall propose legislation that conforms with the waiver provisions no later than the next regular legislative session following the issuance of the waiver.

The implementation of the provisions of this part 7 relating to services provided on a supportive care campus are conditioned upon the approval of necessary waiver amendments by the federal government. The provisions of this part 7 relating to supported living shall be implemented to the extent authorized by federal waiver and in accordance with applicable federal requirements.

Provisions of this part 7 that are approved by the federal government and are authorized by federal waiver shall remain in effect only for so long as specified in the federal waiver, unless otherwise extended by the federal government. The state department shall provide written notice to the revisor of statutes of the final termination date of the waiver, and this part 7 shall be repealed, effective July 1 of the year in which the waiver is terminated.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1957, § 7, effective July 1.

25.5-6-706. Rate structure - rules - quality assurance.

The state board, by rule, shall set tiered per diem rates for services provided on a supportive care campus under this part 7. When structuring the tiered per diem rates, the state board shall consider the medical and cognitive needs of eligible persons being served on the supportive care campus.

The maximum per diem rate for the services provided on a supportive care campus shall not exceed the total per diem cost of comparable populations either in institutions or in other community-based settings.

The state board shall adopt rules necessary for quality assurance, which shall include certification of supportive care campuses.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1958, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-686 as it existed prior to 2006.